vi: Chất liệu loa kèn của kèn thợ săn: Đồng thau vàng sẫm; Bạc niken; Đồng thau đỏ; Bạc sterling; Đồng thau vàng; Khác
ja: フレンチホーンベル素材: ゴールドブラス; 洋白; ローズブラス; スターリングシルバー; イエローブラス; その他
sk-SK: Materiál lievika lesného rohu: Zlatá mosadz; Alpaka; Červená mosadz; Šterlingové striebro; Žltá mosadz; Iné
nb: Bjellemateriale i valthorn: Gullmessing; Nysølv; Rosémessing; Sterlingsølv; Gul messing; Annet
zh-TW: 法國號喇叭口材質: 金銅; 白銅; 玫瑰銅; 純銀; 黃銅; 其他
el: Υλικό καμπάνας γαλλικού κόρνου: Χρυσός ορείχαλκος; Αλπακάς (nickel silver); Ροζ ορείχαλκος; Ασήμι sterling; Κίτρινος ορείχαλκος; Άλλο
bg-BG: Материал на камбаната на валдхорна: Златен месинг; Алпака; Розов месинг; Сребро проба 925; Жълт месинг; Друго
sv: Material för valthornstratt: Guldmässing; Nysilver; Rödmässing; Sterlingsilver; Gulmässing; Övrigt
pt-PT: material da campana da trompa: Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão rosa; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
en: French horn bell material: Gold brass; Nickel silver; Rose brass; Sterling silver; Yellow brass; Other
es: Material de la campana de la trompa: Latón dorado; Alpaca; Latón rosado; Plata esterlina; Latón amarillo; Otro
sl-SI: Material odmevnika francoskega roga: Zlata medenina; Novo srebro (alpaka); Rožnata medenina; Srebro sterling; Rumena medenina; Drugo
ru: Материал раструба валторны: Золотая латунь; Нейзильбер; Розовая латунь; Стерлинговое серебро; Желтая латунь; Другое
hu: Francia kürt tölcsérének anyaga: Aranyréz; Alpakka; Rózsaréz; Sterling ezüst; Sárgaréz; Egyéb
ro-RO: Materialul pavilionului cornului francez: Alamă aurie; Alpacca; Alamă roșie; Argint masiv; Alamă galbenă; Altele
zh-CN: 圆号喇叭口材质: 金黄铜; 白铜; 玫瑰黄铜; 925 纯银; 黄铜; 其他
it: Materiale del padiglione del corno francese: Ottone dorato; Alpacca; Ottone rosa; Argento sterling; Ottone giallo; Altro
fr: Matériau du pavillon du cor français: Laiton doré; Maillechort; Laiton rose; Argent sterling; Laiton jaune; Autre
tr: Korno çanı malzemesi: Altın pirinç; Nikel gümüş; Gül rengi pirinç; Som gümüş; Sarı pirinç; Diğer
de: Material des Waldhorn-Schallbechers: Goldmessing; Neusilber; Rotmessing; Sterlingsilber; Gelbmessing; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Valtornos gaubto medžiaga: Auksinis žalvaris; Naujasidabris; Rausvasis žalvaris; Didelio grynumo sidabras; Geltonasis žalvaris; Kita
da: Materiale for valdhornets lydstykke: Guldmessing; Nysølv; Rosamessing; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal zvona francuskog roga: Zlatna mjed; Novo srebro; Ružičasta mjed; Sterling srebro; Žuta mjed; Ostalo
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำปากลำโพงของเฟรนช์ฮอร์น: โกลด์บราส; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; โรสบราส; เงินสเตอร์ลิง; เยลโลว์บราส; อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał dźwięcznika waltorni: Złoty mosiądz; Nowe srebro; Różowy mosiądz; Srebro wysokiej próby; Żółty mosiądz; Inny
cs: Materiál ozvučníku lesního rohu: Zlatá mosaz; Nové stříbro; Červená mosaz; Mincovní stříbro; Žlutá mosaz; Jiné
ko: 프렌치 호른 벨 소재: 골드 브라스; 니켈 실버; 로즈 브라스; 스털링 실버; 옐로우 브라스; 기타
fi: Käyrätorven kellon materiaali: Kultamessinki; Uushopea; Ruusumessinki; Sterling-hopea; Keltamessinki; Muu
pt-BR: Material da campana da trompa: Latão ouro; Alpaca; Latão rosa; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
nl: Materiaal Franse hoorn: Goudmessing; Nieuwzilver; Rozemessing; Sterling zilver; Geelmessing; Overige